utilities/dictionaries/cs_CS-Czech.dic
Abramowski/é
Academia/í
Adria/í
Alec/í
Alexandria/í
Alicia/í
Alighieri/í
Amalia/í
Amelia/í
Anastasia/í
Andrzejewski/é
Armani/í
Artia/í
Ashley/í
Avia/í
Babczynski/é
Babczyński/é
Baia/í
Balzac/í
Barchanski/é
Bastia/í
Baszczynski/é
Baňkowski/é
Bažanowski/é
Bednarski/é
Bentley/í
Bernoulli/í
Bielawski/é
Bierski/é
Blanc/í
Bobby/í
Bobrowski/é
Bocheński/é
Bodoni/í
Bohemia/í
Bondy/í
Borowski/é
Borski/é
Borussia/í
Bradbury/í
Brasilia/í
Brescia/í
Brodsky/é
Brzuchanski/é
Brzuchański/é
Budzinski/é
Bukowski/é
Burakowski/é
Cassiopeia/í
Catania/í
Cauchy/í
Cecilia/í
Cedric/í
Celia/í
Chamurapi/í
Chirac/í
Claudia/í
Columbia/í
Concordia/í
Cynthia/í
Cyrankowski/é
Czajkowski/é
Dabrowski/é
Dacia/í
Dalia/í
Danny/í
Delia/í
Dembowski/é
Dilia/í
Disney/í
Dolfi/í
Dominic/í
Dronski/é
Duczynski/é
Economia/í
Eric/í
Euboia/í
Eurovia/í
Fabia/í
Federic/í
Felicia/í
Fellini/í
Fréderic/í
Fujimori/í
Gatsby/í
Gawlowski/é
Gałczyński/é
Gloria/í
Golasowski/é
Grabovski/é
Grabowski/é
Hardy/í
Harley/í
Harvey/í
Henry/í
Hlisnikowski/é
Huitzilopochtli/í
Huxley/í
Hybernia/í
Iberia/í
Invia/í
Isaac/í
Ischia/í
Ivanovski/é
Izzy/í
Jakubowski/é
Janoszowski/é
Jasinski/é
Jastrzembski/é
Jaworski/é
Jay/í
Jeffrey/í
Jerry/í
Jeziorski/é
Jimmy/í
Joe/í
Joey/í
Johnny/í
Jordi/í
José/í
Jurgovski/é
Jurzykowski/é
Kaczynski/é
Kaminski/é
Kampučia/í
Kautsky/é
Kendzierski/é
Kennedy/í
Kenny/í
Kerouac/í
Kielkowski/é
Kobierski/é
Kochanowski/é
Konarski/é
Konkolski/é
Kony/í
Korostenski/é
Korzeniowski/é
Kosiński/é
Kossakowski/é
Kovalski/é
Kowalowski/é
Kowalski/é
Kowolowski/é
Krzemiński/é
Kubinski/é
Kucharski/é
Kuczyński/é
Kurowski/é
Kwiecinski/é
Larry/í
Legerski/é
Legierski/é
Lenny/í
Leszczynski/é
Lewandowski/é
Lewinski/é
Lipowski/é
Livia/í
Lumia/í
Lupienski/é
Lupinski/é
Lévi/í
Mackowski/é
Mafia/í
Magnolia/í
Majewski/é
Makowski/é
Maria/í
Maslowski/é
Mattoni/í
Matuszyński/é
Mauriac/í
Mecnarowski/é
Melski/é
Messi/í
Mia/í
Michalski/é
Mickey/í
Mike/í
Miki/í
Milerski/é
Monrovia/í
Monty/í
Mooney/í
Moravia/PVí
Morawski/é
Murphy/í
Mussolini/í
Muszyński/é
Nadia/í
Natalia/í
Nokia/í
Octavia/í
Olivia/í
Olympia/í
Orawski/é
Ostia/í
Osuchowski/é
Palowski/é
Parchanski/é
Parchański/é
Patria/í
Patric/í
Patricia/í
Pawlowski/é
Pellegrini/í
Philadelphia/í
Pietrowski/é
Piotrowski/é
Piwowarski/é
Podermański/é
Podgorski/é
Porebski/é
Porembski/é
Prachowski/é
Pretoria/í
Rakowski/é
Romanowski/é
Rooney/í
Rory/í
Rosalia/í
Rákóczi/í
Róžański/é
Saarikoski/í
Santini/í
Scania/í
Shelby/í
Sieratovski/é
Silvia/í
Skalski/é
Sladkowski/é
Slavia/í
Slavonski/é
Slávia/í
Smilowski/é
Sobaňski/é
Sofia/í
Sonny/í
Sophia/í
Staniowski/é
Stanley/í
Starczewski/é
Stonawski/é
Sunny/í
Suski/é
Swiatkowski/é
Sylvia/í
Synthesia/í
Szarowski/é
Szczepański/é
Szotkovski/é
Szotkowski/é
Szydlowski/é
Taši/í
Teddy/í
Thierry/í
Toby/í
Torricelli/í
Tracy/í
Tucholsky/é
Tókóly/í
Utopia/í
Valencia/í
Veolia/í
Verdi/í
Victoria/í
Viktoria/í
Virginia/í
Viterbi/í
Vivaldi/í
Wadowski/é
Walaski/é
Waliszewski/é
Waśniowski/é
Weselowski/é
Wielkopolski/é
Wikipedia/í
Wisniowski/é
Wišniewski/é
Wojciechowski/é
Wojkowski/é
Wolski/é
Wróblewski/é
Xperia/í
Zakrzewski/é
Zamarski/é
Zdebski/é
Zielinski/é
Zukofsky/é
afroamerický/Yy
amerikánský/Yy
antidogmatický/Yy
antiideologický/Yy
antiimperialistický/Yy
antileninský/Yy
antinomický/Yy
antiromantický/Yy
antisemitický/Yy
antitoxický/Yy
antiutopický/Yy
apollónský/Yy
arkadický/Yy
artový/Yy
audiofilský/Yy
avantgardistický/Yy
baráčnický/Yy
bavorácký/Yy
biocentrický/Yy
biodynamický/Yy
bolestínský/YyR
bondovský/Yy
boulovitý/Yy
brizantní/YRy
bruslivý/Yy
bukolický/Yy
buranský/YyR
básnířský/Yy
břídilský/YyR
chmatácký/Yy
chórický/Yy
chňapavý/Yy
cigánský/Yy
cizí/yYKRN
cukavý/Yy
deindustrializovaný/Yy
domestikovatelný/Yy
dospělácký/Yy
drnovitý/Yy
dvorecký/Yy
děsuplný/Yy
enigmatický/Yy
esenbácký/Yy
esesácký/Yy
estébácký/Yy
euroskeptický/Yy
evropanský/Yy
excesivní/YRy
fakírský/Yy
fejetonistický/Yy
fialovomodrý/Yy
fragilní/Yy
funebrácký/Yy
futsalový/Yy
fučíkovský/Yy
fušerský/yYKRN
granulární/Yy
hambatý/Yy
hardcoreový/Yy
hardcorový/Yy
harlekýnský/Yy
hašišácký/Yy
hiphopový/Yy
hipsterský/YyR
hoffmannovský/Yy
hokejbalový/Yy
hurvínkovský/Yy
hutia/í
hymnový/Yy
hypnabilní/Yy
imažinistický/Yy
imigrantský/Yy
impresívní/Yy
inkluzivní/YRy
inkluzívní/Yy
jangový/Yy
jinový/Yy
juniorní/Yy
kanonýrský/Yy
kaplanský/Yy
karbanický/Yy
karikaturistický/Yy
katarzní/Yy
kašpárkovský/Yy
klaunovský/Yy
klipovitý/Yy
klišovitý/Yy
kmetský/Yy
knihomolský/Yy
kogia/í
koukatelný/YRyN
krabicovitý/Yy
kverulantský/Yy
kádrovácký/Yy
kšeftařský/Yy
legitimistický/Yy
lesácký/Yy
lifestylový/Yy
lordský/Yy
luetický/Yy
machistický/Yy
makabrózní/YRy
mazácký/Yy
mesianistický/Yy
milováníhodný/Yy
mičurinský/Yy
mrchožroutský/Yy
multižánrový/Yy
nablblý/Yy
nabušený/Yy
naddimenzovaný/YRy
nadšenecký/Yy
nahlédnutelný/Yy
namotivovaný/YyN
načinčaný/Yy
načuchlý/Yy
nekrotický/Yy
neostalinistický/Yy
nuancovaný/YRy
nuzácký/Yy
obouchaný/Yy
obživlý/Yy
ochladlý/Yy
ochuravělý/Yy
odleželý/Yy
odosobnělý/Yy
odplynulý/Yy
odvětralý/Yy
ojínělý/Yy
oprsklý/Yy
opršelý/Yy
oslzlý/Yy
ovocitý/Yy
očadlý/Yy
očekávatelný/YRy
očtený/Yy
pamfletický/Yy
paranoia/í
partikularistický/Yy
pasácký/Yy
pepický/Yy
plutokratický/Yy
podpásový/Yy
podvodnický/Yy
podvraťácký/Yy
pofiderní/YRy
popský/Yy
populárněvědecký/Yy
postideologický/Yy
poturčený/Yy
pragocentrický/Yy
prasácký/Yy
preclíkový/Yy
profláklý/Yy
propedeutický/Yy
propůjčovaný/YKRNy
protidemokratický/Yy
protievropský/YyR
protifundamentalistický/Yy
protiindividualistický/Yy
protiirácký/Yy
protikolonialistický/Yy
protiměšťácký/Yy
protiseparatistický/Yy
protistranický/Yy
protivědecký/Yy
provokatérský/Yy
prozrálý/Yy
prořízlý/Yy
pseudoantický/Yy
pseudodemokratický/Yy
pseudofilozofický/Yy
pseudopoetický/Yy
pseudoromantický/Yy
pseudosocialistický/Yy
pseudoumělecký/Yy
pseudovlastenecký/Yy
přehoustlý/Yy
přidrzlý/Yy
přirozpláclý/Yy
přismahlý/Yy
přitvrdlý/Yy
přičmoudlý/Yy
rajcovný/YRy
regionalistický/Yy
rockerský/YyR
rodácký/Yy
rozjařilý/Yy
rozkladitý/Yy
rozkurážený/Yy
rozmázlý/Yy
rozplynulý/Yy
rozrozpláclý/Yy
roztáhlý/Yy
rudomodrý/Yy
ruralistický/Yy
rychloobrátkový/Yy
ryzí/yYKRN
rétorský/Yy
schizmatický/Yy
sekernický/Yy
seniorní/Yy
sensualistický/Yy
sesedlý/Yy
setřelý/Yy
sešeřelý/Yy
sežehlý/Yy
skopčácký/Yyw
skousnutelný/Yy
sociálimperialistický/Yy
splihlý/Yy
společenskokritický/Yy
strašácký/Yy
suprový/Yy
světlomodrý/Yy
svěží/yYR
sólistický/Yy
technicistní/YRy
tmářský/Yy
triumfalistický/Yy
trosečnický/Yy
trénovatelný/YyN
ublíženecký/Yy
uklouzaný/Yy
ukrutánský/Yy
ulhaný/Yy
umdlelý/Yy
univerzalistický/Yy
uondaný/YRy
upozaděný/Yy
urvalý/Yy
ustydlý/Yy
utichlý/Yy
uštěkaný/Yy
velikanánský/Yy
vidlácký/Yy
vybruslený/Yy
vyfouklý/Yy
vyhnilý/Yy
vyklidněný/Yy
vykrvácený/Yy
vymóděný/Yy
vysportovaný/YRy
vytuněný/Yy
vyvrženecký/Yy
všespolečenský/Yy
zakřiklý/Yy
zarezlý/Yy
zaseklý/Yy
zbožštělý/Yy
zcvrklý/Yy
zdůvěrnělý/Yy
zestručnělý/Yy
zhnědlý/Yy
změšťáčtělý/Yy
znenáhlý/Yy
zpychlý/Yy
ztmavlý/Yy
zvlažnělý/Yy
černomodrý/Yy
ďáblovský/Yy
šmrncovní/YRy
švihlý/Yy
Žeromski/é
Žukowski/é
Žukrowski/é
